District of Columbia statutes.
29-1015.08

Subchapter not exclusive.

This subchapter shall not prohibit a limited cooperative association from being merged under law other than this chapter.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Uniform Law: This section is based on § 1612 of the Uniform Limited Cooperative Association Act.